Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Jail Construction Authority

441.605.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

441.610

to

441.695

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Agreement” means a written contract between the authority and any person, firm, corporation, local government, or public entity providing for the construction, reconstruction, improvement or repair and financing of one (1) or more projects of the authority;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority, a body corporate and politic, and an agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth of Kentucky created by KRS

441.615

;

“Bonds” mean revenue bonds, notes or other obligations issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

;

“Cost” means the expenditures for construction, acquisition, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction, principal and interest on any bonds or notes or obligations issued by the authority, engineering and legal expenses, plans, specifications, cost and revenue estimates, other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing any project, administrative expenses, and such other expenses necessary or incident to the construction of and placing into operation a project, the financing of such construction and the acquisition of the project;

“Lease” means a written lease executed by the authority as lessor and any local government as lessee;

“Project” means any undertaking to construct, reconstruct, improve, or repair any jail or appurtenant facilities thereof for any county or urban-county government, together with all property, rights, easements and interests which may be acquired by the authority for the construction, reconstruction or repair of any jail or appurtenant facilities; or any undertaking by the authority to finance or refinance, under the provisions of KRS

441.625

, the cost of construction or reconstruction of any jail of any county or urban-county government completed and approved by the legislative body thereof since January 1, 1982, provided that such construction or reconstruction is in compliance, at the time such financing or refinancing is approved, with specifications, standards and requirements which are established by the authority to be made applicable to any undertaking by the authority pursuant to KRS

441.625

to

441.695

on or after July 15, 1983;

“Jail” means any county jail and correctional or detention facilities, including correctional facilities defined in KRS

67B.020

and juvenile detention facilities, operated by and under the supervision of any county or urban-county government;

“Local government” means any county or urban-county government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A fiscal court can contribute $200 of county funds to the Kentucky Association of County Judge/Executives for legal expenses of a lawsuit filed against the Kentucky Local Facilities Construction Authority, where the purpose of the lawsuit is to seek a clarification and interpretation of the new jail legislation in this chapter, since this jail legislation is of immediate and pressing concern to fiscal courts in Kentucky.

OAG 83-447

.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Johnson, Reforming Kentucky’s Jails, Vol. 46, No. 3, July 1982, Ky. Bench & Bar 14.

441.610.
Legislative intent — Additional and alternative nature.

KRS

441.625

to

441.695

is intended solely to provide an additional and alternative method of constructing, reconstructing, improving, or repairing and financing jails and appurtenant facilities for any local government in this state to the end that such projects expedite the provision of safe and proper facilities by a local government for the incarceration of prisoners as defined by KRS

441.005

. Nothing in KRS

441.625

to

441.695

shall be construed as prohibiting a local government from providing for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or repair and financing of a jail and appurtenant facilities as may be otherwise provided by law.

Nothing in KRS

441.625

to

441.695

shall be construed as prohibiting two (2) or more local governments from entering into a cooperative agreement for the purpose of participating with the authority in providing for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or repair and financing of a jail and appurtenant facilities for the use and benefit of all local governments agreeing to the cooperative undertaking, but the authority shall determine the number and location of regional jails and regional detention centers, as authorized by KRS

441.625

.

Subsection (2) of this section is intended solely as an alternative method to KRS

65.210

to

65.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 262, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.615.
Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority — Membership — Corporate character — Officers — Staff — Records.

There is created and established within the Finance and Administration Cabinet a Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority, composed of ten (10) members who shall be:

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or his designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections, or his designee;

The designee of the Kentucky Jailers Association;

The designee of the Kentucky County Judges/Executive Association;

The designee of the Kentucky Association of Counties;

The designee of the Kentucky Magistrates and Commissioners Association;

Two (2) citizen members appointed by the Governor; and

Two (2) members of the General Assembly appointed by the Governor.

The ex officio members shall serve for the term of their respective office. The legislative members of the authority shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

Citizen members shall begin their terms on August 1, 1982, and shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years; however, in making initial appointments, the Governor shall appoint one (1) member for a term of two (2) years, and one (1) member for a term of three (3) years.

Vacancies occurring in the term of any member shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The ten (10) members of this authority and their successors are a body corporate and politic constituting a public corporation and governmental agency and instrumentality of the Commonwealth, with perpetual succession and with power in that name to contract and be contracted with, to acquire and convey property, to sue and be sued, to have and use a corporate seal, and to exercise all of the usual powers of corporations not inconsistent with specifically enumerated powers.

The members of the authority shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessary and incidental to the performance of their duties and function as members of this authority.

The chairman of the authority shall be the secretary of finance. The members of the authority shall elect a vice chairman and secretary from their membership.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall designate an employee of his cabinet to serve as treasurer of the authority. The treasurer shall give bond to the authority for a faithful accounting for all funds coming into his custody, in the amount the authority may prescribe, drawn upon a surety company qualified to do business in the Commonwealth, the premium to be paid by the Commonwealth.

The authority shall establish and maintain an office and the secretary of the authority shall maintain there complete records of the authority’s actions and proceedings, as public records open to inspection. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide the funds, staff assistants, facilities, and materials required by the authority in the conduct of its duties and functions. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may require the Department of Corrections to share in the expenses incurred by the Finance and Administration Cabinet in maintaining and operating offices of the authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 211, § 128, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 262, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/92). This section was amended by two 1992 Acts. Where those Acts are not in conflict, they have been compiled together. Where a conflict exists, the Act which was last enacted by the General Assembly prevails, pursuant to KRS

446.250

.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

441.620.
Valid signatures or facsimiles on bonds — Quorum — Meetings — Bylaws — Regulations.

If any of the officers of the authority whose signatures or facsimiles thereof appear on any bonds of the authority or on any other instruments or documents pertaining to the functions of the authority, shall cease to be such officers before delivery of the bonds, or before the effective date or occasion of such instruments or documents, the signatures, and facsimiles thereof, shall nevertheless be valid for all purposes the same as if the officers had remained in office until such delivery or effective date or occasion.

Any six (6) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum.

The authority shall meet not less than every six (6) months and as often as necessary to comply with the provisions of KRS

441.420

to

441.450

when called as provided in this section. Special meetings of the authority may be called by the chairman, and upon written request of two (2) members the chairman shall call a special meeting of the authority to be held not later than twenty (20) days following receipt of the written request. The chairman shall give notice through the secretary by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each member of the authority at least ten (10) days prior to the time of any meeting, unless all members of the authority waive notice in writing. The offices of the authority shall be at the seat of state government.

The authority may adopt bylaws relating to its organization and internal management, and may alter the same at will. Through its bylaws, or by resolution, it shall establish stated times and places for regular meetings; and may adjourn the same from time to time. If a quorum be present at any special meeting, and it shall appear from the minutes that reasonable notice was given to absent members, or waived by them, or the minutes subsequently consented to by them, any business transacted or action taken thereat shall be as fully regular and official as if transacted or taken at a regular meeting or an adjournment thereof.

The authority may adopt rules and regulations for the conducting of its business and affairs, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 2011, ch. 2, § 82, effective June 8, 2011.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.625.
General powers of authority — Authorization for revenue bonds and revenue bond anticipation notes.

The authority may:

Determine the number and location of regional jails and regional juvenile detention centers, in order to prevent duplication of effort and unnecessary costs;

Construct, reconstruct, improve, or repair any jail and appurtenant facilities in any local government in this state, as may be determined by the authority and provided for in an agreement or agreements;

Acquire and convey real estate and any improvements and buildings and facilities located thereon, for which a project is undertaken, and in the manner and under the terms as may be provided by agreement;

Issue revenue bonds, and revenue bond anticipation notes of the authority payable solely from the revenues, rentals, and other funds pledged for their payment, for the purpose of paying any part of the cost of any one (1) or more projects, and to refund any of its bonds;

Combine for financing purpose any two (2) or more projects;

Lease as lessor any project to any local government as lessee, pursuant to the terms and provisions of a lease;

Employ consulting engineers, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, managers, and other employees and agents necessary in the judgment of the authority, and to fix their compensation;

Make and enter into the contracts and agreements with other parties necessary and incidental to the performance of its duties and execution of its powers under KRS

441.625

to

441.695

;

Establish and enforce rules, regulations, and specifications in respect to any project undertaken by the authority, except during any period when the powers are assigned to a lessee pursuant to a lease agreement. The rules, regulations, and specifications shall be consistent with state laws and regulations pertaining to jails;

Receive, accept, and expend funds or other contributions from any source, both public and private, for or in aid of any project undertaken by the authority;

Create and establish a “debt service reserve” pursuant to proceedings and trust indenture of the authority;

Make matching fund grants not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to local governments from funds determined by the authority to be available to it for the purposes, upon the terms and according to the criteria the authority shall in its discretion determine; and

Do all things and perform all acts desirable, necessary, and proper to carry out and implement the powers expressly granted to the authority by KRS

441.625

to KRS

441.695

, including recommending the promulgation of administrative regulations and enactment of legislation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 262, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

441.630.
Contents of agreement between authority and local government — Limits of authority’s financial participation in projects.

If the authority deems it suitable, feasible, necessary, or expedient that any project or projects be financed or refinanced and constructed by the authority, the authority may make one (1) or more written agreements in which the parties may include provisions as to any of the following:

Identify the project to be financed by the authority, setting forth specifications and design of the facilities to be constructed, reconstructed, improved, or repaired, and any other information which is deemed necessary and proper for the development of the project;

Set forth what portions, if any, of the cost of the project have been or shall thereafter be contributed by the authority from the funds and other resources available to it during the then current biennium and not previously obligated. The authority’s contribution from its funds, excluding rentals received under leases made by the authority and any contribution, grant, or gift made to the authority by a local government, person, or entity other than the state, for the use and benefit of the project, shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the cost;

Set forth agreements for planning, design, acquisition of property, soliciting construction bids, awarding construction contracts, issuing of work orders, and other steps necessary or incidental to the construction of the project, and authorizing and selling bonds for the project;

Agree that upon completion of the project the lessee will continuously pay all of the cost of repairing, maintaining, and operating the project;

Agree that upon the happening of stated events and the performance of stated conditions not inconsistent with law, the authority shall convey the project to the lessee;

Set forth the terms and provisions of lease or proposed conveyance to be entered into by and between the authority and any local government, including the requirement that all new jail construction projects receiving any authority funding shall provide an agreed upon number of beds for state prisoners at a rate set by the commissioner of the Department of Corrections but which in no case shall be less than seventy-five percent (75%) of the actual daily cost of maintaining a prisoner;

Agree that upon determination of the amount of bonds to be issued by the authority for the project and the interest rate or rates the bonds are to bear, and prior to the delivery of any bonds to the purchaser, the rental to be paid during the term of the lease and each term for which the lease may be renewed shall be established according to a method of computation set forth in the proposed lease, and that the authority and lessee, each by authorized persons, shall execute the lease and file the original or a signed counterpart in the office of the authority, and the Secretary of State of the Commonwealth;

Agree to establish any method of interim financing by the authority during the construction of any project, with borrowed funds from any bank, trust company, or banking institution, the funds to be amortized from money obtained through the sale of revenue bonds before, during, or at completion of the construction of such project or projects; and

Agree to establish guidelines for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, or repair of projects determined by the authority to qualify for grants from the authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 497, § 16, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 129, effective July 14, 1992.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Acts 1982, ch. 54, amending KRS

337.010

,

337.505

,

337.520

, and

337.530

, relating to prevailing wages, is applicable to construction projects carried on by the Kentucky local correctional facilities construction authority.

OAG 82-314

.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.635.
Leases between authority and local governments authorized — Contents.

The authority and any local government are authorized and empowered to enter into a lease with respect to any project according to any agreement or agreements made pursuant to KRS

441.630

. Any lease may contain, in substance, any of the following provisions and such other provisions not inconsistent herewith as the authority and local government may deem appropriate and desirable:

That the lease is for the remainder of the fiscal period in which it is dated and executed, and is automatically renewable for the succeeding fiscal period, one (1) at a time, until the final maturity date of the bond issue to which the lease is related, or until the local government notifies the authority in writing within sixty (60) days before the expiration of the lease that the local government will not renew said lease;

That with respect to the fiscal period in which the lease is dated and executed, the local government shall otherwise be firmly bound only (a) to contribute to the authority such portions, if any, of the cost of the project as the agreement prescribes shall be paid by the local government; and (b) to pay the authority the rental prescribed for such fiscal period;

That if the local government shall fully perform all such obligations during such initial term of the lease, it shall have an exclusive option to automatically renew the lease at the time and in the manner prescribed for the ensuing fiscal period, effective on the first day thereof; no local government shall be or become in any way obligated to pay the rental stipulated for such fiscal year unless the lease be so automatically renewed; and that the local government shall, upon any such renewal, be firmly bound to pay to the authority the rental stipulated for such fiscal period as a general obligation of the local government to be paid from any funds available to the local government required by law or by previous binding contract to be devoted to some other purpose;

In like manner and subject to the same conditions and provisions as are set forth in subsection (3) of this section, if the local government shall in the first ensuing fiscal year fully perform its obligations and pay to the authority the rental stipulated for such fiscal period, the local government shall have another exclusive option to automatically renew such lease for another fiscal year, and so on for successive fiscal periods until the final fiscal period for which the lease may be renewed;

That so long as the lease is renewed from time to time and the local government fully performs all its obligations as lessee, including payment of the rental stipulated in the lease,

The revenues of the project shall be collected, segregated, distributed, deposited, secured, disbursed and accounted for in strict conformity with the proceedings and trust indenture of the authority, and the aggregate of such revenues properly accounted for and deposited pursuant to said proceedings and trust indenture shall, to the extent provided in the lease, be a credit against the local government’s rental or other obligations for the current fiscal period under the term of the lease, and

Any revenues collected pursuant to KRS

441.685

, or other funds as may be provided and made available to the authority by the Commonwealth or other sources, and set aside pursuant to an agreement, shall be applied as provided in said proceedings and trust indenture and shall, to the extent provided in the lease, be a credit against the local government’s rental or other obligations for the then current fiscal period under the lease.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.640.
Revenue bonds issued by authority — Limits on first issue — Provisions for delivery of bond or note certificates.

The authority may provide for the issuance of revenue bonds to pay any part of the cost of any projects undertaken pursuant to an agreement and lease; provided that, the authority shall not issue bonds before July 15, 1983, and until the total amount of revenues collected and deposited in the authority’s fund equals or exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000). The principal and interest on such bonds are payable solely from the funds provided for such payment. Any issue may be in one (1) or more series and any such series may enjoy equal or subordinate status with respect to the pledge of funds from which they are payable, shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as established by the authority, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their date or dates, all as may be provided by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The authority shall determine the form of the bonds and shall fix the denomination of the bonds and the place or places for payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the Commonwealth or at the office of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The bonds shall be signed by the facsimile signature of the chairman or secretary of the authority, and the seal of the authority or a facsimile thereof shall be affixed thereto and attested by the manual signature or a facsimile thereof of the secretary or chairman of the authority. All bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

shall have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the uniform commercial code, KRS Chapter 355. The authority may sell such bonds at public or private sale.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or projects for which such bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust indenture securing the same. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than such cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust indenture securing the same, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue exceed such cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund or funds for such bonds or any account or accounts therein as the authority shall have provided in the proceedings or trust indenture authorizing and securing such bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue notes or temporary bonds exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

The terms of the trust indenture under which bonds or notes are issued may delegate to the trustee the authority to establish procedures for the physical delivery of bond or note certificates either at the time of original issuance or on subsequent transfers but any such method shall be subject to the approval of the authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 8, effective July 13, 1984.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.645.
Revenue bonds are not debt of Commonwealth.

Bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

do not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof, or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any such political subdivision, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds, and security, provided therefor under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

, and all such bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to that effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 9, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.650.
Trust indenture to secure bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company in or outside of Kentucky. Such trust indenture or the proceedings providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the rents and other revenues to be received. The trust indenture or proceedings may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders which are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, and insurance of the project or projects in connection with which such bonds are authorized, the rates or rental charges, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. It is lawful for any bank or trust company which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee. In addition, any such trust indenture or proceedings may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust indenture or proceedings may be treated as a part of the cost of the project or projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 10, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.655.
Rights and remedies of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

and the trustee under any trust indenture, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, protest and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth or granted under KRS

441.625

to

441.695

or under such trust indenture or proceedings to be performed by the authority or by any officer or employees thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of rents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 415, § 9, effective July 13, 1984.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.660.
Status of authority’s bonds as investments.

Bonds issued by the authority are securities in which all public officers and public bodies, agencies and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, bank associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar nature may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 12, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.665.
Authority may issue revenue refunding bonds — Purposes.

The authority may provide for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if the authority shall so determine, for the additional purpose of constructing improvements, extensions, or enlargements of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued. The authority may also provide for the issuance of its revenue bonds for the combined purpose of:

Refunding any bonds then outstanding which are issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of such bonds, and

Paying any part of the cost of any additional project or projects.

The issuance of such bonds, maturities and other details thereof, for rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority in respect of the same, shall be governed by the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

insofar as the same may be applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 13, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.670.
Application of authority’s revenues — Purposes.

All moneys, received under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

, either from the sale of bonds or as revenues, are to be held and applied solely as provided in KRS

441.625

to

441.695

. The proceedings or the trust indenture shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such moneys are deposited shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulation as KRS 441.625 to 441.695 and such proceedings or trust indenture may provide.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 14, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.675.
Authority’s property, income, revenues and bonds are tax-exempt.

The authority is not required to pay any taxes or assessments of any nature whatsoever, upon any project or projects owned by the authority or leased by the authority; or any property acquired or used by the authority under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

; or upon the incomes or revenues from the lease or use of such property. Nor will there be any tax or assessment of the Commonwealth on any bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

, their transfer or the income therefrom.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 15, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.680.
Conveyance of property by authority.

The authority shall convey in fee simple and at no additional costs to the lessee, any project to the lessee when all bonds issued under the provisions of KRS

441.625

to

441.695

in connection with said project and all interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of such bonds and interest thereon to the maturity thereof shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 16, effective July 15, 1982.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.685.
Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority fund — Use of funds — Investments.

There is created and established a Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority fund which shall consist of the following:

Rentals received under leases made by the authority pursuant to KRS

441.625

to

441.695

;

Appropriations by the General Assembly;

Contributions, grants, and gifts from any source, both public and private, which may be used by the authority for any project or projects;

Disbursements provided under KRS 42.320(2)(b); and

All interest earned on investments made by the state from moneys deposited in this fund.

Moneys accruing to this fund shall be deposited by the State Treasurer in the fund’s trust and agency account, and shall be invested by the state for the benefit and use of the authority, pending their application to the expenses of the authority and to payments of interest and principal of bonds, notes, and other obligations of the authority. Notwithstanding the provisions of the foregoing sentence, at such time or times as the moneys contained in the fund are sufficient to pay the principal on all bonds, notes, and obligations of the authority that would become due in the next ensuing twelve (12) month period, the authority may use moneys in the fund in excess thereof for such purposes as provided for in KRS

441.625

to

441.695

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 2002, ch. 183, § 28, effective August 1, 2002.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.

441.690.
Projects exempt from KRS 56.440 to 56.540 and KRS 45A.045.

Nothing in KRS

56.440

to

56.540

and KRS

45A.045

shall be construed to apply to any project undertaken by the authority pursuant to KRS

441.625

to

441.695

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 496, § 66, effective July 13, 1990.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.